Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.047

State insect.

The common green darner dragonfly, Anax junius drury, is hereby designated as the official insect of the state of Washington.

[ 1997 c 6 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—1997 c 6: "The legislature finds that the common green darner dragonfly, Anax junius drury, can be found throughout Washington and is easily recognizable by its bright green head and thorax. The legislature further recognizes that the common green darner dragonfly, also known as the "mosquito hawk," is a beneficial contributor to our ecosystem." [ 1997 c 6 s 1.]